Hawaii statutes.
§804-10.5 Sureties; qualification.
(a) In determining the sufficiency of a surety or sureties, the court shall
consider the surety's or sureties':

(1) Character;

(2) Reliability;

(3) Place of residence; and

(4) Financial and employment circumstances.

(b) No person shall be sufficient surety who:

(1) Has been convicted of perjury for submitting a
false statement under section 804-11.5;

(2) Does not satisfy the requirements of section
804-11.5; or

(3) Does not satisfy the requirements of article 9A,
chapter 431, if posting an insurance bond as defined in section 431:1-210(1). [L
1987, c 139, §9(2); am L 1993, c 181, §2; am L 2006, c 154, §46]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next